New York, session 2025-2026, A8796.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 13 of section 106 of the alco- 2 holic beverage control law is amended by adding a new subparagraph 3 (xxiv) to read as follows: 4 (xxiv) Parcel A 5 The fourth floor of all that certain lot, piece or parcel of land, 6 together with the buildings and improvements now or hereafter erected 7 thereon, situate, lying and being in the Borough of Manhattan, City, 8 County and State of New York, bounded and described as follows: 9 Beginning at a point on the southerly side of East 57th Street, 10 distant 125 feet easterly from the intersection of the easterly side of 11 Fifth Avenue and the southerly side of 57th Street, thence southerly and 12 parallel with the easterly side of Fifth Avenue 100 feet 5 inches; 13 thence easterly and parallel with the southerly side of 57th Street 50 14 feet; thence northerly and again parallel with the easterly side of 15 Fifth Avenue 100 feet 5 inches to the southerly side of 57th Street; 16 thence westerly along the southerly side of 57th Street 50 feet to the 17 point or place of beginning. 18 Parcel B 19 ALL that certain plot, piece or parcel of land, situate, lying and 20 being in the borough of Manhattan, County, City and State of New York, 21 bounded and described as follows: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13301-01-5 A. 8796 2 1 Beginning at a point on the easterly line of Fifth Avenue, distant 118 2 feet 9 1/2 inches southerly from the intersection of the said easterly 3 line of Fifth avenue with the southerly line of East 58th Street and 4 opposite the center of a certain party wall; running thence easterly and 5 part of the way along the center of said party wall and a line in 6 prolongation thereof 100.00 feet to a point distant 118 feet 11 1/2 7 inches southerly from the southerly line of East 58th Street, measured 8 on a line parallel with Fifth Avenue and distant 100.00 feet from the 9 easterly line thereof, measured along the southerly line of East 58th 10 Street; thence southerly, parallel with Fifth Avenue, 19 feet 6 1/2 11 inches to a point opposite the center of another party wall and distant 12 62 feet 4 inches northerly from the northerly line of East 57th Street, 13 measured at right angles thereto; thence westerly and part of the way 14 along the center line of said last mentioned party wall 100.00 feet to a 15 point on the easterly side of Fifth Avenue, distant 62 feet 6 inches 16 northerly from the intersection of the easterly line of Fifth Avenue and 17 the northerly line of East 57th street; thence northerly along the east- 18 erly line of Fifth Avenue, 19 feet 6 1/2 inches to the point or place of 19 beginning. 20 Provided, however, that with respect to such retail licensee's inter- 21 est in a business engaged in the manufacture or sale at wholesale of 22 alcoholic beverages described in subdivision one-a of section one 23 hundred one of this article: (i) such interest must have been acquired 24 prior to the effective date of this subdivision; (ii) such retail licen- 25 see may not purchase alcoholic beverages directly from any such manufac- 26 turer or wholesaler; and (iii) no more than fifteen percent of the annu- 27 al dollar value of alcoholic beverages purchased by such retail licensee 28 for sale on the premises may be produced by any such manufacturer. 29 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 30 upon the sale or transfer of the parcels detailed in subparagraph (xxiv) 31 of paragraph (a) of subdivision 13 of section 106 of the alcoholic 32 beverage control law, as added by section one of this act, such subpara- 33 graph shall expire and be deemed repealed unless the licensee immediate- 34 ly obtains a leasehold upon such sale or transfer of such parcel as part 35 of the sale or transfer. If the licensee obtains such a leasehold, the 36 subparagraph pertaining to such parcel shall expire and be deemed 37 repealed upon the end or termination of such lease. The state liquor 38 authority shall notify the legislative bill drafting commission upon 39 notification by the licensee of the sale, transfer or termination of the 40 leasehold, or non-renewal of the leasehold of the parcels detailed in 41 subparagraph (xxiv) of paragraph (a) of subdivision 13 of section 106 of 42 the alcoholic beverage control law in order that the commission may 43 maintain an accurate and timely effective data base of the official text 44 of the laws of the state of New York in furtherance of effectuating the 45 provisions of section 44 of the legislative law and section 70-b of the 46 public officers law.